Illinois, session 104th, HB1743.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 104-17 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/104-17)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-17)7    Sec. 104-17. Commitment for treatment; treatment plan. 8    (a) If the defendant is eligible to be or has been released 9on pretrial release or on his own recognizance, the court 10shall select the least physically restrictive form of 11treatment therapeutically appropriate and consistent with the 12treatment plan. The placement may be ordered either on an 13inpatient or an outpatient basis. 14    (b) If the defendant's disability is mental, the court may 15order him placed for secure treatment in the custody of the 16Department of Human Services, or the court may order him 17placed in the custody of any other appropriate public or 18private mental health facility or treatment program which has 19agreed to provide treatment to the defendant. If the most 20serious charge faced by the defendant is a misdemeanor, the 21court shall order outpatient treatment, unless the court finds 22good cause on the record to order inpatient treatment. If the 23court orders the defendant to inpatient treatment in the   HB1743- 2 -LRB104 06270 RLC 16305 b1custody of the Department of Human Services, the Department 2shall evaluate the defendant to determine the most appropriate 3secure facility to receive the defendant and, within 20 days 4of the transmittal by the clerk of the circuit court of the 5court's placement order, notify the sheriff court of the 6designated facility to receive the defendant. Upon receipt of 7the notice, The Department shall admit the defendant to a 8secure facility within 60 days of the transmittal of the 9court's placement order, unless the Department can demonstrate 10good faith efforts at placement and a lack of bed and placement 11availability. If placement cannot be made within 60 days of 12the transmittal of the court's placement order and the 13Department has demonstrated good faith efforts at placement 14and a lack of bed and placement availability, the Department 15shall provide an update to the ordering court every 30 days 16until the defendant is placed. Once bed and placement 17availability is determined, the Department shall notify the 18sheriff who shall promptly transport the defendant to the 19designated facility. If the defendant is placed in the custody 20of the Department of Human Services, the defendant shall be 21placed in a secure setting. During the period of time required 22to determine bed and placement availability at the designated 23facility, the defendant shall remain in jail. If during the 24course of evaluating the defendant for placement, the 25Department of Human Services determines that the defendant is 26currently fit to stand trial, it shall immediately notify the   HB1743- 3 -LRB104 06270 RLC 16305 b1court and shall submit a written report within 7 days. In that 2circumstance the placement shall be held pending a court 3hearing on the Department's report. Otherwise, upon completion 4of the placement process, including identifying bed and 5placement availability, the sheriff shall be notified and 6shall transport the defendant to the designated facility. If, 7within 60 days of the transmittal by the clerk of the circuit 8court of the court's placement order, the Department fails to 9provide the sheriff with notice of bed and placement 10availability at the designated facility, the sheriff shall 11contact the Department to inquire about when a placement will 12become available at the designated facility as well as bed and 13placement availability at other secure facilities. The 14Department shall respond to the sheriff within 2 business days 15of the notice and inquiry by the sheriff seeking the transfer 16and the Department shall provide the sheriff with the status 17of the evaluation, information on bed and placement 18availability, and an estimated date of admission for the 19defendant and any changes to that estimated date of admission. 20If the Department notifies the sheriff during the 2 business 21day period of a facility operated by the Department with 22placement availability, the sheriff shall promptly transport 23the defendant to that facility. The placement may be ordered 24either on an inpatient or an outpatient basis. If the 25Department does not provide placement within the 20 days of 26transmittal from the clerk, the Department shall provide   HB1743- 4 -LRB104 06270 RLC 16305 b1payment to the sheriff, as prescribed by the sheriff, 2including, but not limited to, housing and mental health 3services for each day after 20 days have passed from the time 4the defendant was first placed in the sheriff's custody. The 5sheriff shall not be held liable for any issues encountered 6after the 20th day the defendant remains in his or her care. 7    (c) If the defendant's disability is physical, the court 8may order him placed under the supervision of the Department 9of Human Services which shall place and maintain the defendant 10in a suitable treatment facility or program, or the court may 11order him placed in an appropriate public or private facility 12or treatment program which has agreed to provide treatment to 13the defendant. The placement may be ordered either on an 14inpatient or an outpatient basis.15    (d) The clerk of the circuit court shall within 5 days of 16the entry of the order transmit to the Department, agency or 17institution, if any, to which the defendant is remanded for 18treatment, the following:19        (1) a certified copy of the order to undergo 20    treatment. Accompanying the certified copy of the order to 21    undergo treatment shall be the complete copy of any report 22    prepared under Section 104-15 of this Code or other report 23    prepared by a forensic examiner for the court;24        (2) the county and municipality in which the offense 25    was committed;26        (3) the county and municipality in which the arrest   HB1743- 5 -LRB104 06270 RLC 16305 b1    took place;2        (4) a copy of the arrest report, criminal charges, 3    arrest record; and 4        (5) all additional matters which the Court directs the 5    clerk to transmit.6    (e) Within 30 days of admission to the designated 7facility, the person supervising the defendant's treatment 8shall file with the court, the State, and the defense a report 9assessing the facility's or program's capacity to provide 10appropriate treatment for the defendant and indicating his 11opinion as to the probability of the defendant's attaining 12fitness within a period of time from the date of the finding of 13unfitness. For a defendant charged with a felony, the period 14of time shall be one year. For a defendant charged with a 15misdemeanor, the period of time shall be no longer than the 16sentence if convicted of the most serious offense. If the 17report indicates that there is a substantial probability that 18the defendant will attain fitness within the time period, the 19treatment supervisor shall also file a treatment plan which 20shall include:21        (1) A diagnosis of the defendant's disability;22        (2) A description of treatment goals with respect to 23    rendering the defendant fit, a specification of the 24    proposed treatment modalities, and an estimated timetable 25    for attainment of the goals;26        (3) An identification of the person in charge of   HB1743- 6 -LRB104 06270 RLC 16305 b1    supervising the defendant's treatment.2(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.)